District of Columbia statutes.
8-1041.07

Disposal ban.

(a)

Beginning January 1, 2018, no person in the District shall knowingly dispose of covered electronic equipment or subassemblies of covered electronic equipment as solid waste in the District except through recycling programs or other methods approved by the Mayor.

(b)

Beginning January 1, 2017, no manufacturer shall dispose of covered electronic equipment as solid waste in the District except through recycling programs or other methods approved by the Mayor.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 121, 61 DCR 9971